dictionaries/hsb/hsb.dic
česćelakomy/YW
čopojty/YW
čornolěsowy/Y
ćěkawy/YW
darliwy/YW
deficitny/YW
dobroćelski/Y
amperehodźinowy/Y
beachvolleyballowy/Y
bjezawtowy/YW
bjezhraničny/YW
bjezwuwzaćny/YW
bokoprawy/YW
bolosćiwy/YW
Brězečanski/Y
Bycancski/Y
cyłočasny/Y
častkaty/YW
beninski/Y
ćahaty/YWP
sćěnowy/YW
žerdkowany/PNYW
žołtoběły/YWNP
šćuwanski/PNYW
šicoidny/PNYW
šěsnaćory/PNYW
španiski/PNYW
štó/z
štyripřezny/PNYW
šwižny/PNYW
łučlany/PNYW
absorptiwny/PNYW
adapciski/PNYW
adopciski/PNYW
ćežkotny/PNYW
ćělnahi/YW
aerobny/PNYW
agitatoriski/PNYW
akcidencialny/PNYW
akuzatiwiski/PNYW
alkoholiski/PNYW
amfibiski/PNYW
anachronistiski/PNYW
anatoliski/PNYW
ankaraski/PNYW
antikski/PNYW
antropomorfny/PNYW
apolliniski/PNYW
archaiski/PNYW
aromatiski/PNYW
askorbinowy/Y
atlantiski/PNYW
atributiwny/PNYW
awtoritatiwny/PNYW
błóćany/PNYW
bamžowski/PNYW
bankrotny/PNYW
bestialiski/PNYW
běłokrjepjeny/PNYW
bělkowski/PNYW
binomiski/PNYW
bjezdomny/PNYW
bjezhłósny/PNYW
bjezsłónčny/PNYW
bjeztróštny/PNYW
bójski/PNYW
bólny/PNYW
brěznjanski/PNYW
brjestski/PNYW
burundiski/PNYW
byči/Y
chalkolitiski/PNYW
charakteristiski/PNYW
chcyć/RX
chory/PNYW
chrobły/YWNP
cokowski/PNYW
conalny/PNYW
cylindriski/PNYW
cymplčanski/PNYW
dźěłarniski/PNYW
dźěłowy/Y
dać/RNZX
dawny/PNYW
debiškowski/PNYW
deklamaciski/PNYW
deklaraciski/PNYW
demokratizaciski/PNYW
demoniski/PNYW
diktatoriski/PNYW
diletantiski/PNYW
dołhostny/PNYW
dołhotrajny/PNYW
dodać/RNZ
dojěsć/RNZ
dominantny/PNYW
dominikanski/PNYW
dorozpředać/RNZ
dotydźenski/PNYW
dowěrny/PNYW
dušowny/PNYW
dubčanski/PNYW
dwělny/PNYW
dwěsćělětny/PNYW
dyzenteriski/PNYW
čłowječny/PNYW
česany/PNYW
čestny/PNYW
ekscepcionalny/PNYW
ekscesiwny/PNYW
eksportny/PNYW
ekspresionistiski/PNYW
elektrotechniski/PNYW
entuziastiski/PNYW
čólny/PNYW
eskimowski/PNYW
fašistiski/PNYW
faktiski/PNYW
fertilny/PNYW
fleksiski/PNYW
folikularny/PNYW
frikatiwny/PNYW
gangsterski/PNYW
gastronomiski/PNYW
germinaciski/PNYW
grawimetriski/PNYW
greifswaldski/PNYW
halštrowski/PNYW
helsinkski/PNYW
hepjelski/PNYW
historistiski/PNYW
holiny/PNYW
homeopatiski/PNYW
hornjołužiski/PNYW
hrozny/PNYW
hubny/PNYW
hymniski/PNYW
iloyalny/PNYW
imaginarny/PNYW
indeterminabelny/PNYW
industrialny/PNYW
infernaliski/PNYW
inoficielny/PNYW
inteligentny/PNYW
interimny/PNYW
inwariabelny/PNYW
izocykliski/PNYW
jahły/YWNP
jednoručny/PNYW
jědźny/PNYW
jěsć/RNX
jězdny/PNYW
kaliforniski/PNYW
kapacitiwny/PNYW
karencny/PNYW
kinematiski/PNYW
kliniski/PNYW
knježerski/PNYW
koketny/PNYW
komercielny/PNYW
kompetentny/PNYW
konfederaciski/PNYW
konjunkciski/PNYW
konserwatoriski/PNYW
korpulentny/PNYW
kóstny/PNYW
krywny/PNYW
kulinariski/PNYW
lany/PNYW
legalny/PNYW
lěsniski/PNYW
liturgiski/PNYW
lutowanski/PNYW
małokrejny/PNYW
marathonski/PNYW
masochistiski/PNYW
mensurabelny/PNYW
meteorologiski/PNYW
ministerski/PNYW
mjasny/PNYW
moderny/PNYW
mój/y
monografiski/PNYW
mučničanski/PNYW
muzikalny/PNYW
naš/y
nadpadny/PNYW
nahrabny/PNYW
najěsć/RNZ
naprěčny/PNYW
nastupny/PNYW
nawdać/RNZ
nejny/PNYW
nižozemski/PNYW
nichtó/z
njechać/RX
njedobry/YW
njehódny/YW
njepodobny/YW
njepoměrny/YW
njesnadny/YW
njewidźomny/YW
njewurjekliwy/YW
njezmylny/YW
nochcyć/RX
nowoseelandski/PNYW
nuzny/PNYW
okultny/PNYW
optimalny/PNYW
osmotiski/PNYW
pacifistiski/PNYW
paratny/PNYW
pasabelny/PNYW
periferiski/PNYW
petrolchemiski/PNYW
pječeny/PNYW
plusnikečanski/PNYW
poćehnjeny/PNYW
podać/RNZ
podnazymski/PNYW
přebywanski/PNYW
předać/RNZ
předstajeny/PNYW
přepodać/RNZ
přeswědčeny/PNYW
přewdać/RNZ
pohibowanski/PNYW
přinarodźeny/PNYW
přistajeny/PNYW
pojěsć/RNZ
polěpšowanski/PNYW
polyteistiski/PNYW
porodny/PNYW
posrědni/YW
powědźeć/RNIZ
powodźowanski/PNYW
prakticistiski/PNYW
prestižny/PNYW
procesualny/PNYW
prowokaciski/PNYW
publikny/PNYW
radioaktiwny/PNYW
realistiski/PNYW
rekapitulaciski/PNYW
repulsiwny/PNYW
rězny/PNYW
romaniski/PNYW
rozdać/RNZ
rozpinany/PNYW
rozpředać/RNZ
rudnohórski/PNYW
słódki/PNYW
sćiječanski/PNYW
samlutki/y
samón/y
sataniski/PNYW
sekretariatny/PNYW
serbiski/PNYW
silwesterski/PNYW
skótnolěkarski/PNYW
směšny/PNYW
směć/RNX
solidariski/PNYW
specielny/PNYW
spřećeleny/PNYW
spředać/RNZ
spřidać/RNZ
srěnjohorinski/PNYW
staropječeny/PNYW
stimulaciski/PNYW
studowanski/PNYW
subwenciski/PNYW
swětłočerwjeny/PNYW
swój/y
sydmory/PNYW
systematizowanski/PNYW
tamón/y
tematiski/PNYW
tołsty/YPWN
tónkróćny/PNYW
tón/y
transkripciski/PNYW
truščanski/PNYW
tutón/y
twój/y
typologiski/PNYW
vietnamski/PNYW
wšitkón/y
wšón/y
waš/y
walowski/PNYW
wićny/PNYW
wědźeć/RNX
wěstotny/PNYW
wjelelubowany/PNYW
woženjeny/PNYW
wobdać/RNZ
wobojostronski/PNYW
wochudnjeny/PNYW
wodać/RNZ
wólšany/PNYW
woprawjenski/PNYW
wosrjedźny/PNYW
wotechcyć/RNZ
wotedać/RNZ
wothłosowanski/PNYW
wotjěsć/RNZ
wotprošny/PNYW
wotwodźowanski/PNYW
wudołbany/PNYW
wujězdźanski/PNYW
wulkowikowanski/PNYW
wumóc/RNZ
wupředać/RNZ
wupředawanski/PNYW
wuswojenski/PNYW
wyšosulski/PNYW
wzdać/RNZ
zašiwanski/PNYW
zahajenski/PNYW
zamróčeny/PNYW
zapřisažny/PNYW
zatrašeny/PNYW
zawdać/RNZ
zbrašeny/PNYW
zdać/RNX
zechcyć/RNZ
zezdać/RNZ
zjawny/PNYW
zjěsć/RNZ
zóldnarski/PNYW
krasniši/YS
drobniši/SY
impozantniši/SY
mócniši/SY
profesionalniši/SY
šćedriši/SY
